California statutes. Education Code
The Legislature finds and declares that almost one million, or one of every five, pupils in California’s public schools are of limited English proficiency, and that the number of those pupils is increasing rapidly. In addition, the number of primary languages spoken by California’s limited-English-proficient pupils is increasing. The Legislature recognizes that limited-English-proficient pupils have the same right to a quality education as all California pupils. For these pupils to have access to quality education, their special needs must be met by teachers who have essential skills and knowledge related to English language development, specially designed content instruction delivered in English, and content instruction delivered in the pupils’ primary languages. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Commission on Teacher Credentialing implement an assessment system to certify those teachers who have the essential skills and knowledge necessary to meet the needs of California’s limited-English-proficient pupils.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1050, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.2.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meanings, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Instruction for English language development” means instruction designed specifically for limited-English-proficient pupils to develop their listening, speaking, reading, and writing skills in English.

(b) “Specially designed content instruction delivered in English” means instruction in a subject area, delivered in English, that is specially designed to meet the needs of limited-English-proficient pupils.

(c) “Content instruction delivered in the primary language” means instruction in a subject area delivered in the primary language of the pupil.

(d) “Instruction for primary language development” means instruction designed to develop a pupil’s listening, speaking, reading, and writing skills in the primary language of the pupil.

(e) “Culture and cultural diversity” means an understanding of human relations, including the following:

(1) The nature and content of culture.

(2) Cross cultural contact and interactions.

(3) Cultural diversity in the United States and California.

(4) Approaches to providing instruction responsive to the diversity of the pupil population.

(5) Recognizing and responding to behavior related to bias based on the characteristics listed in Section 220.

(6) Techniques for the peaceful resolution of conflict.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 569, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.3.

(a) The commission shall issue an authorization for a teacher to provide all of the following services to limited-English-proficient pupils:

(1) Instruction for English language development in preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and classes organized primarily for adults, except when the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a children’s center instructional permit pursuant to Sections 8301 and 44252.7, a children’s center supervision permit pursuant to Section 8301, or a designated subjects teaching credential in adult education pursuant to Section 44260.2. If the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a children’s center instructional
 permit, or a children’s center supervision permit, instruction for English language development is limited to the programs authorized by that permit. If the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a designated subjects teaching credential in adult education, instruction for English language development is limited to classes organized primarily for adults.

(2) Specially designed content instruction delivered in English in the subjects and at the levels authorized by the teacher’s prerequisite credential or permit used to satisfy the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(b) The minimum requirements for the authorization, which may be completed at the same time as the initial preparation for the prerequisite credential or at a later date, shall include all of the following:

(1) Possession of a valid California teaching credential, services credential, visiting faculty permit, children’s center instructional permit, or children’s center supervision permit which credential or permit authorizes the holder to provide instruction to pupils in preschool, kindergarten, any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or classes primarily organized for adults, except for any of the following:

(A) Emergency credentials or permits.

(B) Exchange credentials as specified in Section 44333.

(C) District intern credentials as specified in Section 44325.

(D) Sojourn certificated employee credentials as specified in Section 44856.

(E) Teacher education internship credentials as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3.

(2) Passage of one or more examinations, or by completing an approved program that consists of coursework or a combination of coursework and examinations, that the commission determines is necessary for demonstrating the knowledge and skills required for effective delivery of the services included in the authorization.

(3) Completion of at least six semester units, or nine quarter units, of coursework in a second language at a regionally accredited institution of higher education. The commission shall establish minimum standards for scholarship in the required coursework. The commission also shall establish alternative ways in which the requirement can be satisfied by language-learning experience that creates an awareness of the challenges of
 second-language acquisition and development.

(c) Completion of coursework in human relations in accordance with the commission’s standards of program quality and effectiveness that includes, at a minimum, instruction in all of the following:

(1) The nature and content of culture.

(2) Cross-cultural contact and interactions.

(3) Cultural diversity in the United States and California.

(4) Providing instruction responsive to the diversity of the pupil population.

(5) Recognizing and responding to behavior related to the characteristics listed in Section 220.

(6) Techniques for the peaceful resolution of conflict.

(d) The commission shall establish alternative requirements for a teacher to earn the authorization, which shall be awarded as a supplementary authorization pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 44225.

(e) A teacher who possesses a credential or permit described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) and is able to present a valid out-of-state credential or certificate that authorizes the instruction of English language learners may qualify for the authorization issued under this section by submitting an application and fee to the commission.

(f) The commission may issue an authorization under this section if the applicant possesses a valid California teaching credential and holds either of the following certificates issued by the National Board for
 Professional Teaching Standards:

(1) Early and Middle Childhood/English as a New Language Certificate.

(2) Early Adolescence through Young Adulthood/English as a New Language Certificate.

(g) The authorization shall remain valid as long as the prerequisite credential or permit specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) remains valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 6.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.4.

(a) The commission shall issue an authorization for a teacher to provide all of the following services to limited-English-proficient pupils:

(1) Instruction for English language development in preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and classes organized primarily for adults, except when the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a children’s center instructional permit pursuant to Sections 8363 and 44252.7, a children’s center supervision permit pursuant to Section 8363, or a designated subjects teaching credential in adult education pursuant to Section 44260.2. If the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a children’s center instructional permit
 or a children’s center supervision permit, instruction for English language development shall be limited to the programs authorized by that permit. If the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a designated subjects teaching credential in adult education, instruction for English language development shall be limited to classes organized primarily for adults.

(2) Specially designed content instruction delivered in English in the subjects and at the levels authorized by the teacher’s prerequisite credential or permit used to satisfy the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(3) Content instruction delivered in the pupil’s primary language in the subjects and at the levels authorized by the teacher’s prerequisite credential or permit used to satisfy the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision
 (b).

(4) Instruction for primary language development in preschool, kindergarten, grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and classes organized primarily for adults, except when the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a children’s center instructional permit, a children’s center supervision permit, or a designated subjects teaching credential in adult education. If the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a children’s center instructional permit or a children’s center supervision permit, instruction for primary language development is limited to the programs authorized by that permit. If the requirement specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) is satisfied by the possession of a designated subjects teaching credential in adult education, instruction for primary language development is limited to classes organized primarily for adults.

(b) The minimum requirements for the authorization, which may be completed at the same time as the initial preparation for the prerequisite credential or at a later date, shall include both of the following:

(1) Possession of a valid California teaching credential, services credential, visiting faculty permit, children’s center instructional permit, or children’s center supervision permit which credential or permit authorizes the holder to provide instruction to pupils in preschool, kindergarten, any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, or classes primarily organized for adults, except for the following:

(A) Emergency credentials or permits.

(B) Exchange credentials as specified in Section 44333.

(C) District intern credentials as specified in Section 44325.

(D) Sojourn certificated employee credentials as specified in Section 44856.

(E) Teacher education internship credentials as specified in Article 3 (commencing with Section 44450) of Chapter 3.

(2) Passage of one or more examinations, or by completing an approved program that consists of coursework or a combination of coursework and examinations, that the commission determines is necessary for demonstrating the knowledge, skills, and language proficiency required for effective delivery of the services included in the authorization.

(c) To earn the authorization, teachers who hold the authorization described in Section 44253.3, or in Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 44475) of
 Chapter 3, as that section and that article existed on December 31, 1992, shall not be required to pass examinations that primarily assess the skills and knowledge necessary for effective delivery of the services included in the authorizations they possess.

(d) The authorization shall remain valid as long as the prerequisite credential or permit specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) remains valid.

(e) The commission initially shall issue authorizations for languages spoken by the largest numbers of limited-English-proficient pupils for which there are reasonable numbers of teachers or potential teachers who speak those languages. The commission shall explore alternative ways to make authorizations available for other languages.

(f) A teacher who possesses a credential or permit described in paragraph (1) of
 subdivision (b), and who is able to present a valid out-of-state credential or certificate that authorizes content instruction delivered in a pupil’s primary language, may qualify for the authorization issued pursuant to this section by submitting an application and a fee to the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 32.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.45.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the commission may approve a teacher education program offered by a school district or county office of education administered for purposes of earning a cross-cultural language and academic development certificate, English learner authorization, or a bilingual authorization certificate,
 including a California Teacher of English Learners program.

(b) The commission shall apply the standards for approval of a program of professional preparation offered by a regionally accredited institution of higher education to a program of professional preparation offered by a school district or county office of education under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 727, Sec. 1.   (AB 1306)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.5.

(a) The commission shall develop and administer examinations on which a teacher can demonstrate his or her competence in the knowledge and skills necessary for effective teaching of limited-English-proficient pupils. For the purpose of demonstrating the competencies specified in paragraphs (5) and (6) of subdivision (c) in languages for which the commission has developed no examinations, the commission may establish guidelines for approving assessments performed by organizations that are expert in the language and culture assessed.

(b) To the extent possible, the scope and content of the examinations shall be congruent with the scope and content of the commission-approved professional preparation programs for prospective teachers of limited-English-proficient pupils.

(c) The scope and content of the examinations shall consist of the professional skills and knowledge that are determined by the commission to be necessary for effective teaching of limited-English-proficient pupils, and shall include, but need not be limited to, the following domains of professional knowledge and skill:

(1) First- and second-language development and the structure of language.

(2) Methodology of English language development and specially designed content instruction in English.

(3) Culture and cultural diversity.

(4) Methodology of content instruction in the pupil’s primary language.

(5) The culture associated with a specific language group.

(6) Competence in a language other than English that is spoken by limited-English-proficient pupils in California.

(d) In the development of the examinations, the commission shall confer with selected professionals who are knowledgeable and experienced in the education of limited-English-proficient pupils, with colleges and universities that prepare teachers for limited-English-proficient pupils, and with the State Department of Education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   Effective July 11, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.6.

(a) Until the commission begins the administration of Section 44253.5, as added by Chapter 1050 of the Statutes of 1992, the commission shall continue to administer Sections 44253.5 and 44253.6 and Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 44475) of Chapter 3, as those sections and that article existed on December 31, 1992.

(b) A teacher who earned a passing score on a part of the examination for the bilingual cross-cultural certificate that was administered by the commission pursuant to Sections 44253.5 and 44253.6 as those sections existed on December 31, 1992, shall not be required by the commission, as a requirement for earning the certificate described in Section 44253.3 or 44253.4, to take a duplicate examination within nine years of the date when the teacher earned the passing score.

(c) A teacher who has passed both sections of the examination for the language development specialist certificate of competence that was administered by the commission pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 44475) of Chapter 3 as that article existed on December 31, 1992, shall have five years from the date of his or her earliest passing score to complete the other requirements and apply for the language development specialist certificate of competence.

(d) After the commission begins to administer the examinations required by Section 44253.5, the commission shall continue to administer, until June 30, 1995, the examination for the language development specialist certificate administered pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 44475) of Chapter 3 as that article existed on December 31, 1992, solely to those individuals who, on or after June 30, 1992, were enrolled in language development specialist programs approved by the commission pursuant to that article.

(e) Certificates of bilingual cross-cultural competence issued by the commission pursuant to Sections 44253.5 and 44253.6 as those sections existed on December 31, 1992, and certificates of competence as language development specialist issued by the commission pursuant to Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 44475) of Chapter 3 as it existed on December 31, 1992, shall remain valid as long as the holder’s prerequisite teaching credential for those certificates as specified in Sections 44253.5 and 44253.6 and Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 44475) of Chapter 3 remain valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 809, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.7.

(a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing, based upon the availability of funds, shall develop objective and verifiable standards for an authorization for bilingual-cross-cultural competence for holders of an appropriate credential, certificate, authorization, or permit who will be serving English language learners. These authorizations may be issued to persons holding an appropriate credential or authorization issued by the commission, including, but not limited to, counselors; special education professionals, including, but not limited to, the holders of special education credentials, clinical services credentials, and school psychologist authorizations; and child development and preschool professionals.

(b) Candidates for the authorization, by oral and written examination, or by completing an approved program that consists of coursework or a combination of coursework and examinations, shall demonstrate all of the following either at the same time as the initial preparation for the prerequisite credential or at a later date:

(1) That the person is competent in both the oral and written skills of a language other than English.

(2) That the person is competent in both the oral and written skills in the English language. A passing score on the reading and writing portions of the basic skills proficiency test administered pursuant to Section 44252.5 or in accordance with Section 44252 shall satisfy the written skills portion of this requirement.

(3) That the person has both the knowledge and understanding of the cultural and historical heritage of the limited-English-proficient individuals to be served.

(4) That the person has the ability to perform the services the candidate is certified or authorized to perform in English and in a language other than English.

(c) The commission may develop rules and regulations setting forth objective and verifiable standards for approval of training programs leading to the authorizations issued pursuant to this section.

(d) For the purpose of assessing the qualifications established by the commission in accordance with this section, the commission shall develop rules, regulations, or guidelines establishing an assessment system that may include local educational agencies, institutions of higher education, and qualified nonprofit bilingual testing agencies as assessor agencies.

(e) It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that possession of any authorization established by this section be a state-mandated requirement for employment. It is the intent that this is a matter for local educational agencies to determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 660, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.8.

(a) For the examinations required by Sections 44253.5 and 44253.7, the commission shall charge examination fees that are sufficient to recover the costs of developing and administering the examinations, including the costs of periodic studies of the examinations, except to the extent that these costs are recovered by appropriations from another source of funds.

(b) In addition to the fees collected pursuant to subdivision (a), within the limits set forth in this chapter, the commission may establish and collect fees to recover its costs for the administration of any assessment of teaching competence adopted by the commission to implement the provisions of this chapter, unless the costs are recovered by appropriations from another source of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 737, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.9.

The commission shall promulgate regulations to clarify and make specific the requirements and authorizations of credentials, certificates, and permits established pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1050, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.10.

(a) A teacher with a basic teaching credential may be assigned to provide specially designed content instruction delivered in English, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44253.2, to limited-English-proficient pupils only if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The teacher, as of January 1, 1999, is a permanent employee of a school district, county office of education, or school administered under the authority of the Superintendent, or was previously a permanent employee and then was employed in a school district within 39 months of the previous permanent status, or has been employed in a school district with an average daily attendance of not more than 250 for at least two years.

(2) The teacher completes 45 clock hours of staff development in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English before January 1, 2008. The extension of the date by which a teacher is required to complete this staff development shall not be construed as authorizing teachers to teach limited-English-proficient pupils without a certificate issued pursuant to this section or Sections 44253.3 and 44253.4.

(b) (1) The commission, in consultation with the Superintendent, shall establish guidelines for the provision of staff development pursuant to this section. The commission and the Superintendent shall use their best efforts to establish these guidelines as soon as possible, but not later than January 1, 1996. Staff development pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the commission’s guidelines.

(2) To ensure the
 highest standards of program quality and effectiveness, the guidelines shall include quality standards for the persons who train others to perform staff development training and for those who provide the training. The guidelines may require that teachers who qualify to provide instruction pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) include a portion, within the total 45 clock hours of training provided pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), in English language development.

(3) The guidelines for training to meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) may provide for 20 hours, or fewer hours as the commission may specify, of training in any aspect of English language development or specially designed content instruction delivered in English.

(4) The guidelines shall require that the staff development offered pursuant to this section be aligned to the teacher
 preparation leading to the issuance of a certificate pursuant to Section 44253.3 and any amendments made to that section. This alignment, however, shall not result in any increase in the number of hours of staff development necessary to meet the requirements of this section.

(5) The guidelines and standards established by the commission to implement this section shall require and maintain compliance with any requirements mandated by federal law for purposes of ensuring continued federal financial assistance.

(6) The commission shall review staff development programs in relation to the guidelines and standards established pursuant to this section. The review shall include all programs offered pursuant to this section except programs previously approved pursuant to subdivision (c). If the commission finds that a program meets the applicable guidelines and standards, the commission
 shall forward a report of its findings to the chief executive officer of the sponsoring school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited institution of higher education. If the commission finds that a program does not meet the applicable guidelines or standards, or both, the report of the commission shall specify the areas of noncompliance and the time period in which a second review shall occur. If a second review of a program by the commission reveals a pattern of continued noncompliance with the applicable guidelines or standards, or both, the sponsoring agency shall not offer the program to teachers who have not already enrolled in it. The effective date for commission approval of staff development programs not currently approved as of January 1, 2000, shall be on or before January 1, 2002, except for persons already enrolled in programs by January 1, 2002.

(7) By December 4, 2007, the commission shall report to the
 Legislature on the status of the 45-hour and the 90-hour alternative programs, including the strengths and weaknesses of the process and programs. In preparing the report, the commission shall include a summary of its review pursuant to paragraph (6) of the staff development programs.

(c) The staff development may be sponsored by any school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited institution of higher education that meets the standards included in the guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (b) or any organization that meets those standards and is approved by the commission. Any equivalent three semester unit or four quarter unit class may be taken by the teacher at a regionally accredited institution of higher education to satisfy the staff development requirement described in either subdivision (a) or (d), or both. Once the commission has made a determination that a college or university class is equivalent, no
 further review of the class shall be required pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), regardless of the date of the initial review.

(d) (1) A teacher who completes the staff development described in subdivision (a) shall be awarded a certificate of completion of staff development in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English.

(2) A teacher who completes the staff development described in subdivision (a) may provide specially designed content instruction delivered in English, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44253.2, and instruction for English language development, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 44253.2, in any departmentalized teaching assignment consistent with the authorization of the teacher’s basic credential. This authorization also applies to teachers who completed the required staff development
 before January 1, 2000.

(3) A teacher who completes the staff development described in subdivision (a) shall not be assigned to provide content instruction delivered in the pupil’s primary language, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 44253.2.

(4) A teacher who completes the staff development described in subdivision (a) may be assigned to provide instruction for English language development, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 44253.2, in a self-contained classroom under either of the following circumstances:

(A) The teacher has taught for at least nine years in California public schools, certifies that the teacher has had experience or training in teaching limited-English-proficient pupils, and authorizes verification by the entity that issues the certificate of completion. The teacher shall be awarded a
 certificate of completion in methods of instruction for English language development in a self-contained classroom.

(B) The teacher has taught for less than nine years in California public schools, or has taught for at least nine years in California public schools but is unable to certify that the teacher has had experience or training in teaching limited-English-proficient pupils, but has, within three years of completing the staff development described in subdivision (a), completed an additional 45 hours of staff development, including specially designed content instruction delivered in English and English language development training, as set forth in the guidelines developed pursuant to subdivision (b). Upon completion of this additional staff development, the teacher shall be awarded a certificate of completion in methods of instruction for English language development in a self-contained classroom.

(e) During the period in which a teacher is pursuing the training specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) or subdivision (d), or both, including the period for the assessment and awarding of the certificate, the teacher may be provisionally assigned to provide instruction for English language development, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 44253.2, or to provide specially designed content instruction delivered in English, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44253.2.

(f) (1) A teacher who completes the staff development with any provider specified in subdivision (c), and who meets the requirements of subdivision (a) or (d) for a certificate of completion of staff development in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English or English language development in a self-contained classroom, or both, shall be issued the
 certificate or certificates.

(2) A teacher who completes a staff development program in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English or English language development in a self-contained classroom, or both, who has been determined by the commission to meet the applicable guidelines and standards pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b), shall receive a certificate or certificates of completion from the commission upon submitting an application, a staff development verification form to be furnished by the commission, and payment of a fee to be set by the commission, not to exceed forty-five dollars ($45).

(3) A person who is enrolled in, or who has completed, a staff development program not approved by the commission before January 1, 2002, may, until January 1, 2003, apply to any of the following agencies for the certificate or certificates, but the
 teacher shall be issued the certificate or certificates by only one of these agencies:

(A) The school district in which the teacher is a permanent employee.

(B) The county office of education in the county in which the teacher is an employee for an agency specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a).

(C) Any school district or county office of education that provides staff development pursuant to subdivision (c). Before issuing a certificate or certificates based on an equivalent class or classes, as provided for in subdivision (c), the issuing agency shall determine if the class or classes meet the guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (b).

(4) Any school district or county office of education that issues a certificate of completion shall
 forward a copy of the certificate to the commission within 90 days of issuing the certificate.

(5) (A) An agency that issues a certificate or certificates of completion may charge the teacher requesting the certificate or certificates of completion a fee that will cover the actual costs of the agency in issuing, forwarding to the commission a copy of, and paying any fee charged by the commission for receiving and servicing, the certificate or certificates of completion.

(B) The commission may charge the agency that forwards a copy of a certificate or certificates of completion a one-time fee to cover the actual costs to the commission to file the copy or copies, and to issue duplicates when requested by the teacher. The fee shall not exceed an amount equal to one-half the fee the commission charges for issuing a credential.

(g) The certificate of completion is valid in all California public schools. A teacher who has been issued a certificate of completion may be assigned indefinitely to provide the instructional services named on the certificate in any school district, county office of education, or school administered under the authority of the Superintendent.

(h) The governing board of each school district shall make reasonable efforts to provide limited-English-proficient pupils in need of English language development instruction with teachers who hold appropriate credentials, language development specialist certificates, or cross-cultural language and academic development certificates that authorize English language development instruction. However, any teacher awarded a certificate or certificates of completion shall be deemed certificated and competent to provide the services listed on that
 certificate of completion. A teacher who completes staff development pursuant to this section may use those hours of staff development to meet the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 44277.

(i) Any teacher completing staff development pursuant to this section shall be credited with three semester units or four quarter units for each block of 45 hours of staff development completed for the purpose of meeting the requirements set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 44253.3.

(j) Any school district may use funds allocated to it for the purposes of Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 44681) to provide staff development pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 663, Sec. 7.   (AB 320)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

44253.11.

(a) A teacher with a designated subjects teaching credential or a service credential with a special class authorization may enroll in a course that meets the minimum requirements of staff development in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English, as described in Section 44253.3, 44253.4, 44253.7, or 44253.10.

(b) (1) The commission, in consultation with the Superintendent, shall establish guidelines for the provision of staff development pursuant to this section that are at least as rigorous as the guidelines established pursuant to Section 44253.10. The commission and the Superintendent may designate guidelines established pursuant to Section 44253.10 in satisfaction of this subdivision. Staff development
 pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the guidelines of the commission.

(2) To ensure the highest standards of program quality and effectiveness, the guidelines shall include quality standards applicable to persons who train others to perform staff development training, as well as for persons who provide the training.

(3) The guidelines shall require that staff development offered pursuant to this section be aligned with the teacher preparation that leads to the issuance of a certificate pursuant to Section 44253.3.

(4) The guidelines and standards established by the commission to implement this section shall comply with federal law.

(5) The commission shall review staff development programs in relation to the guidelines and standards
 established pursuant to this section. The review shall include all programs offered pursuant to this section. If the commission finds that a program meets the applicable guidelines and standards, the commission shall forward a report of its findings to the chief executive officer of the sponsoring school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited institution of higher education. If the commission finds that a program does not meet the applicable guidelines or standards, or both, the report of the commission shall specify the areas of noncompliance and the time period in which a second review must occur. If a second review reveals a pattern of continued noncompliance with the applicable guidelines or standards, or both, the sponsoring agency shall be prohibited from continuing to offer the program to teachers.

(c) The staff development may be sponsored by a school district, county office of education, or regionally accredited
 institution of higher education that meets the standards included in the guidelines established pursuant to this section or an organization that meets those standards and that is approved by the commission. An equivalent course may be taken by a teacher at a regionally accredited institution of higher education in order to satisfy the staff development requirement. Once the commission makes a determination that a college or university class is equivalent, no further review of the class shall be required.

(d) (1) A teacher who completes the staff development described in this section shall be awarded a certificate of completion in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English.

(2) A teacher who completes the staff development described in this section is allowed to provide specially designed content instruction delivered in English, as
 defined in subdivision (b) of Section 44253.2.

(3) A teacher who completes the staff development described in this section shall not be assigned to provide content instruction delivered in the primary language of the pupil, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 44253.2.

(e) A teacher who completes a staff development program in methods of specially designed content instruction delivered in English pursuant to this section shall receive a certificate of completion from the commission upon submitting an application, a staff development verification form to be furnished by the commission, and payment of a fee, as determined by the commission, not to exceed forty-five dollars ($45).

(f) The certificate of completion is valid in all public schools. A teacher who has been issued a certificate of completion may be
 assigned indefinitely to provide the instructional services named on the certificate in a school district, county office of education, or school administered under the authority of the Superintendent.

(g) Teacher assignments made in accordance with this section shall be included in the report required by Section 44225.6.
